Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1440
Law enforcement reserve officers; serve as peace officers; when.

Law enforcement reserve officers shall serve as peace officers on the orders and at the discretion of the sheriff, the mayor, or the chief of police.

Laws 1976, LB 782, § 3.